California statutes. Insurance Code
-------------------------------------------

10509.6.

Every life insurer that uses an agent in a life insurance or annuity sale shall do the following:

(a) Require with or as part of each completed application for life insurance or annuity, a statement signed by the agent as to whether he or she knows a replacement is or may be involved in the transaction.

(b) Where a replacement is involved:

(1) Require from the agent with the application for life insurance or annuity: (i) a list of all of the applicant’s existing life insurance or annuity to be replaced, and (ii) a copy of the replacement notice provided the applicant pursuant to Section 10509.4. The existing life insurance or annuity
 shall be identified by name of insurer, insured, and contract number. If a number has not been assigned by the existing insurer, alternative identification, such as an application or receipt number, shall be listed.

(2) Send to each existing life insurer a written communication advising of the replacement or proposed replacement and the identification information obtained pursuant to this section and a policy summary, contract summary, or ledger statement containing policy data on the proposed life insurance or annuity. Cost indices and equivalent level annual dividend figures need not be included in the policy summary or ledger statement. This written communication shall be made within three working days of the date the application is received in the replacing insurer’s home or regional office, or the date the proposed policy or contract is issued, whichever is sooner.

(3) Every
 existing life insurer or the insurer’s agent that undertakes a conservation shall, within 20 days from the date the written communication plus the materials required in subdivisions (1) and (2) are received by the existing insurer, furnish the policyowner with a policy summary for the existing life insurance or ledger statement containing policy data on the existing policy or annuity. Information relating to premiums, cash values, death benefits, and dividends, if any, shall be computed from the current policy year of the existing life insurance. The policy summary or ledger statement shall include the amount of any outstanding indebtedness, the sum of any dividend accumulations or additions, and may include any other information that is not in violation of any regulation or statute. Cost indices and equivalent level annual dividend figures need not be included. When annuities are involved, the disclosure information shall be that in the contract summary.

The
 replacing insurer may request the existing insurer to furnish it with a copy of the summaries or ledger statement, which shall be within five working days of the receipt of the request.

(c) The replacing insurer shall maintain evidence of the “notice regarding replacement,” the policy summary, the contract summary, and any ledger statements used, and a replacement register, cross-indexed by replacing agent and existing insurer to be replaced. The existing insurer shall maintain evidence of policy summaries, contract summaries, or ledger statements used in any conservation. Evidence that all requirements were met shall be maintained for at least three years.

(d) The replacing insurer shall provide on the front of the policy jacket or on the cover page of its life insurance policy or annuity contract or, alternatively, as a separate written document which is delivered with the life
 insurance policy or annuity contract, a notice stating that the owner has a right to an unconditional refund of all premiums paid which right may be exercised within a period of 30 days commencing from the date of delivery of the contract. In the case of variable annuities, and variable life insurance, return of the contract during the cancellation period shall entitle the owner to a refund of the account value and any policy fee paid. The account value and policy fee shall be refunded by the insurer to the owner within 30 days from the date that the insurer is notified that the owner has canceled the contract.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 9) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 166, Sec. 10.   (AB 2347)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.7.

(a) If in the solicitation of a direct response sale, an insurer does not propose the replacement, and a replacement is involved, the insurer shall send to the applicant with the policy a replacement notice as described in subdivision (d) of Section 10509.4 or other substantially similar form approved by the commissioner. In those instances the insurer may delete the last sentence and the reference to signatures from the form without having to obtain approval of the form from the commissioner.

(b) If the insurer proposed the replacement it shall do the following:

(1) Provide to applicants or prospective applicants with or as part of the application a
 replacement notice as described in subdivision (d) of Section 10509.4.

(2) Request from the applicant with or as part of the application, a list of all existing life insurance or annuities to be replaced and properly identified by name of insurer and insured.

(3) Comply with the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 10509.6, if the applicant furnishes the names of the existing insurers, and the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 10509.6, except that it need not maintain a replacement register.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 417, Sec. 29.   (AB 1696)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.8.

(a) A violation of this article shall occur if an agent or insurer recommends the replacement or conservation of an existing policy by use of a materially inaccurate presentation or comparison of an existing contract’s premiums and benefits or dividends and values, if any, or recommends that an insured 65 years of age or older purchase an unnecessary replacement annuity.

(b) For purposes of this section, “unnecessary replacement” means the sale of an annuity to replace an
 existing annuity that requires that the insured will pay a surrender charge for the annuity that is being replaced and that does not confer a substantial financial benefit over the life of the policy to the purchaser so that a reasonable person would believe that the purchase is unnecessary.

(c) Patterns of action by policyowners who purchase replacement policies from the same agent after indicating on applications that replacement is not involved, shall constitute a rebuttable presumption of the agent’s knowledge that replacement was intended in connection with the sale of those policies, and such patterns of action shall constitute a rebuttable presumption of the agent’s intent to violate this article. 

(d) This article does not prohibit the use of additional material other than that which is required that is not in violation of this article or any other statute or
 regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 547, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.9.

(a) Any agent or other person or entity engaged in the business of insurance, other than an insurer, who violates this article is liable for an administrative penalty of no less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the first violation.

(b) Any agent or other person or entity engaged in the business of insurance, other than an insurer, who engages in practices prohibited by this chapter a second or subsequent time or who commits a knowing violation of this article, is liable
 for an administrative penalty of no less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and no more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each violation.

(c) Any insurer who violates this article is liable for an administrative penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the first violation.

(d) Any insurer who violates this article with a frequency as to indicate a general business practice or commits a knowing violation of this article, is liable for an administrative penalty of no less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) and no more than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for each violation.

(e) After a hearing conducted in accordance with Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the commissioner may
 suspend or revoke the license of any person or entity that violates this article.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to affect any other authority provided by law to the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 546, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Suitability Requirements for Annuity Transactions before January 1, 2025 [10509.910. - 10509.919.]

10509.910.

The purpose of this article is to require insurers to establish a system to supervise recommendations and to set forth standards and procedures for recommendations to consumers that result in transactions involving annuity products, so that the insurance needs and financial objectives of consumers at the time of the transaction are appropriately addressed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 295, Sec. 2.   (AB 689)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.911.

(a) This article shall apply to any recommendation to purchase, exchange, or replace an annuity made to a consumer that results in the purchase, exchange, or replacement that was recommended.

(b) Nothing in this act shall be interpreted to preclude, preempt, or otherwise interfere with the application of any other laws of this state that may apply in any matter involving the sale of an annuity that is subject to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 295, Sec. 2.   (AB 689)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.912.

Unless otherwise specifically included, this article shall not apply to transactions involving any of the following:

(a) Direct response solicitations where there is no recommendation based on information collected from the consumer pursuant to this article.

(b) Contracts used to fund any of the following:

(1) An employee pension or welfare benefit plan that is covered by the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA) of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq.).

(2) A plan described by Section 401(a), 401(k), 403(b), 408(k), or 408(p) of the Internal Revenue Code (IRC), as amended, if
 established or maintained by an employer.

(3) A government or church plan defined in Section 414 of the IRC, a government or church welfare benefit plan, or a deferred compensation plan of a state or local government or tax-exempt organization under Section 457 of the IRC.

(4) A nonqualified deferred compensation arrangement established or maintained by an employer or plan sponsor.

(5) Settlements of or assumptions of liabilities associated with personal injury litigation or any dispute or claim resolution process.

(6) Formal prepaid funeral contracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 114.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.913.

(a) “Annuity” means an annuity that is an insurance product under California law that is individually solicited, regardless of whether or not the product is classified as an individual or group annuity.

(b) “Commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner.

(c) “Continuing education credit” or “CE credit” means one continuing education credit hour as defined in Section 2188.2(i) of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) “Continuing education provider” or “CE
 provider” means an individual or entity that is certified to offer continuing education courses pursuant to Section 2186.1(b) and Section 2188 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(e) “Insurance producer” means a person required to be licensed under California law to sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance, including annuities. An insurance producer is also referred to in this article as a “producer.”

(f) “Insurer” means a company required to be licensed or to hold a certificate of authority, or both, under California law to provide insurance products, including annuities.

(g) “Recommendation” means advice or guidance provided or made by an insurance producer or by an insurer to an individual consumer
 that results in a purchase, exchange, or replacement of an annuity in accordance with that advice or guidance.

(h) “Replacement” means a transaction in which a new policy or contract is to be purchased, and it is known or should be known to the proposing producer, or to the proposing insurer, regardless of whether or not there is a producer, that by reason of the transaction, an existing policy or contract has been or is to be any of the following:

(1) Lapsed, forfeited, surrendered or partially surrendered, assigned to the replacing insurer, or otherwise terminated.

(2) Converted to reduced paid-up insurance, continued as extended
 term insurance, or otherwise reduced in value by the use of nonforfeiture benefits or other policy values.

(3) Amended so as to effect either a reduction in benefits or a reduction in the term for which coverage would otherwise remain in force or for which benefits would be paid.

(4) Reissued with any reduction in cash value.

(5) Used in a financed purchase.

(i) “Suitability information” means information that is reasonably appropriate to determine the suitability of a recommendation, including all of the following:

(1) Age.

(2) Annual
 income.

(3) Financial situation and needs, including the financial resources used for the funding of the annuity.

(4) Financial experience.

(5) Financial objectives.

(6) Intended use of the annuity.

(7) Financial time horizon.

(8) Existing assets, including investment and life insurance holdings.

(9) Liquidity needs.

(10) Liquid net worth.

(11) Risk
 tolerance.

(12) Tax status.

(13) Whether or not the consumer has a reverse mortgage.

(14) Whether or not the consumer intends to apply for means-tested government benefits, including, but not limited to, Medi-Cal or the veterans’ aid and attendance benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 148, Sec. 1.   (SB 924)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.914.

(a) In recommending to a consumer the purchase of an annuity or the exchange of an annuity that results in another insurance transaction or series of insurance transactions, the producer, or an insurer if no producer is involved, shall have reasonable grounds for believing that the recommendation is suitable for the consumer on the basis of the facts disclosed by the consumer as to their investments and other insurance products and as to their financial situation and needs, including the consumer’s suitability information, and that there is a reasonable basis to believe all of the following:

(1) The consumer has been reasonably informed of various features of the annuity,
 such as the potential surrender period and surrender charge, potential tax penalty if the consumer sells, exchanges, surrenders, or annuitizes the annuity, mortality and expense fees, investment advisory fees, potential charges for and features of riders, limitations on interest returns, insurance and investment components, and market risk.

(2) The consumer would receive a tangible net benefit from the transaction.

(3) The particular annuity as a whole, the underlying subaccounts to which funds are allocated at the time of purchase or exchange of the annuity, and riders and similar product enhancements, if any, are suitable, and in the case of an exchange or replacement, the transaction as a whole is suitable, for the particular consumer based on their suitability information.

(4) In the case of an exchange or replacement of an annuity, the exchange or replacement is suitable, including taking into consideration all of the following:

(A) Whether the consumer will incur a surrender charge, be subject to the commencement of a new surrender period, lose existing benefits, such as death, living, or other contractual benefits, or be subject to increased fees, investment advisory fees, or charges for riders and similar product enhancements.

(B) Whether the consumer would benefit from product enhancements and improvements.

(C) Whether the consumer has had another annuity exchange or replacement and, in particular, an exchange or replacement within
 the preceding 60 months.

(b) Prior to the execution of a purchase, exchange, or replacement of an annuity resulting from a recommendation, a producer, or an insurer where no producer is involved, shall make reasonable efforts to obtain the consumer’s suitability information.

(c) Except as permitted under subdivision (d), an insurer shall not issue an annuity recommended to a consumer unless there is a reasonable basis to believe the annuity is suitable based on the consumer’s suitability information. The preceding sentence and subdivision (d) notwithstanding, neither a producer nor an insurer shall in any event recommend to a person 65 years of age or older the sale of an annuity to replace an existing annuity that requires the insured to pay a surrender charge for the annuity that is
 being replaced, where purchase of the annuity does not confer a substantial financial benefit over the life of the policy to the consumer, so that a reasonable person would believe the purchase is unnecessary.

(d) (1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), neither a producer nor an insurer shall have any obligation to a consumer under subdivision (a) or (c) related to an annuity transaction if any of the following occur:

(A) No recommendation is made.

(B) A recommendation was made and was later found to have been prepared based on materially inaccurate information provided by the consumer.

(C) A consumer refuses to provide
 relevant suitability information and the annuity transaction is not recommended.

(D) A consumer decides to enter into an annuity transaction that is not based on a recommendation of the insurer or the producer.

(2) An insurer’s issuance of an annuity subject to paragraph (1) shall be reasonable under all the circumstances which are actually known, or which after reasonable inquiry should be known, to the insurer or the producer at the time the annuity is issued.

(e) A producer or, where no producer is involved, the responsible insurer representative, shall,
 at the time of sale, do all of the following:

(1) Make a record of any recommendation subject to subdivision (a).

(2) Obtain a customer-signed statement documenting the customer’s refusal to provide suitability information, if any.

(3) Obtain a customer-signed statement acknowledging that an annuity transaction is not recommended if the customer decides to enter into an annuity transaction that is not based on the producer’s or insurer’s recommendation.

(f) (1) An insurer shall establish a supervision system that is reasonably designed to achieve the insurer’s and its producers’ compliance with this article, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The insurer shall maintain reasonable procedures to inform its producers of the requirements of this article and shall incorporate the requirements of this article into relevant producer training manuals.

(B) The insurer shall establish standards for producer product training and shall maintain reasonable procedures to require its producers to comply with the requirements of Section 10509.915.

(C) The insurer shall provide product-specific training and training materials
 which explain all material features of its annuity products to its producers.

(D) The insurer shall maintain procedures for review of each recommendation prior to issuance of an annuity that are designed to ensure that there is a reasonable basis to determine that a recommendation is suitable. The review procedures may apply a screening system for the purpose of identifying selected transactions for additional review and may be accomplished electronically or through other means, including, but not limited to, physical review. An electronic or other system may be designed to require additional review only of those transactions identified for additional review by the selection criteria.

(E) The insurer shall maintain reasonable procedures to detect recommendations that are not
 suitable. This may include, but is not limited to, confirmation of consumer suitability information, systematic customer surveys, interviews, confirmation letters, and programs of internal monitoring. Nothing in this subparagraph prevents an insurer from complying with this subparagraph by applying sampling procedures or by confirming suitability information after issuance or delivery of the annuity.

(F) The insurer shall annually provide a report to its senior management, including to the senior manager responsible for audit functions, which details a review, with appropriate testing, reasonably designed to determine the effectiveness of the supervision system, the exceptions found, and corrective action taken or recommended, if any.

(2) (A) Nothing in
 this subdivision restricts an insurer from contracting for performance of a function, including maintenance of procedures, required under paragraph (1). An insurer is responsible for taking appropriate corrective action, and may be subject to sanctions and penalties pursuant to Section 10509.916
 regardless of whether the insurer contracts for performance of a function and regardless of the insurer’s compliance with subparagraph (B). An insurer is responsible for the compliance of its producer with the provisions of this article regardless of whether the insurer contracts for performance of a function required under this subdivision and regardless of the insurer’s compliance with subparagraph (B).

(B) An insurer’s supervision system under paragraph (1) shall include reasonable supervision of contractual performance under this subdivision. This includes, but is not limited to, both of the following:

(i) Reasonable monitoring and, as appropriate, conducting audits to ensure that the contracted function is properly performed.

(ii) Annually obtaining a certification from a senior manager who has responsibility for the contracted function that the manager has a reasonable basis to represent, and does represent, that the function is properly performed.

(3) An insurer is not required to include in its system of supervision a producer’s recommendations to consumers of products other than the annuities offered by the insurer.

(g) A producer or insurer shall not dissuade, or attempt to dissuade, a consumer from any of the following:

(1) Truthfully responding to an insurer’s request for confirmation of suitability information.

(2) Filing a complaint.

(3) Cooperating with the investigation of a complaint.

(h) (1) This subdivision applies to FINRA broker-dealer sales of variable and fixed annuities.

(2) Sales by FINRA broker-dealers that comply with the suitability and supervision system requirements set forth in FINRA Rule 2330, or any successor rule, shall satisfy the suitability and supervision system requirements of this article, provided that the suitability criteria used also include both of the following:

(A) The consumer’s income.

(B) The intended use of the annuity.

(3) Except as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2), all other provisions of this article remain applicable to these broker-dealer sales.

(4) Nothing in this subdivision shall limit the commissioner’s ability to enforce, including conducting investigations related to, the provisions of this article.

(5) “FINRA” means the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority or a successor agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 2, Sec. 3.   (SB 263)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.915.

(a) A producer shall not solicit the sale of an annuity product unless the producer has adequate knowledge of the product to recommend the annuity and the producer is in compliance with the insurer’s standards for product training. A producer may rely on insurer-provided product-specific training standards and materials to comply with this subdivision.

(b) (1) A producer who is otherwise entitled to engage in the sale of annuity products shall complete a one-time eight credit-hour annuity training course approved by the commissioner and provided by a commissioner-approved education provider, prior to commencing the transaction of annuities, pursuant to subdivision
 (a) of Section 1749.8.

(2) In addition to the requirement set forth in paragraph (1), every producer who engages in this state in the sale of annuity products shall satisfactorily complete four continuing education credits prior to license renewal every two years, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1749.8.

(3) The training required under this subdivision shall include information on all of the following topics:

(A) The types of annuities and various classifications of annuities.

(B) Identification of the parties to an annuity.

(C) How fixed, variable, and indexed annuity contract
 provisions affect consumers.

(D) The application of income taxation of qualified and nonqualified annuities.

(E) The primary uses of annuities.

(F) Prohibited sales practices, the recognition of indicators that a prospective insured may lack the short-term memory or judgment to knowingly purchase an insurance product, and fraudulent and unfair trade practices, as well as replacement and disclosure requirements for sales of annuities, all as provided under California law, including, but not limited to, this article.

(4) Providers of courses intended to comply with this section shall cover all topics listed in the prescribed outline and shall not present any
 marketing information or provide training on sales techniques or provide specific information about a particular insurer’s products. Additional topics may be offered in conjunction with and in addition to the required outline.

(5) A provider of an annuity training course intended to comply with this section shall register as a CE provider in this state and comply with the rules and guidelines applicable to producer continuing education courses as set forth in Section 1749.8, in subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 1749.1, and in Sections 2188, 2188.1, 2188.2, 2188.3, 2188.4, 2188.50, 2188.6, 2188.7, 2188.8, and 2188.9 of Title 10 of the California Code of
 Regulations.

(6) Annuity training courses may be conducted and completed by classroom or self-study methods in accordance with Sections 2188.2 and 2188.3 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(7) Providers of annuity training shall comply with the reporting requirements and shall issue certificates of completion in accordance with Section 2188.8 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(8) An insurer shall verify that a producer has completed the annuity training required under this section before allowing the producer to sell an annuity product for that insurer. An insurer may satisfy its responsibility under this paragraph by obtaining certificates of completion of the training course or
 obtaining reports provided by commissioner-sponsored database systems or vendors or from a reasonably reliable commercial database vendor that has a reporting arrangement with approved insurance education providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 2, Sec. 4.   (SB 263)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.916.

(a) An insurer is responsible for compliance with this article. If a violation occurs, either because of the action or inaction of the insurer or its insurance producer, the commissioner may, in addition to any other available penalties, remedies, or administrative actions, order any or all of the following:

(1) An insurer to take reasonably appropriate corrective action for any consumer harmed by the insurer’s, or by its insurance producer’s, violation of this article.

(2) A managing general agent or an insurance producer to take reasonably appropriate corrective action for any consumer harmed by the insurance producer’s violation
 of this article.

(3) Penalties and sanctions pursuant to Section 10509.9. For purposes of Section 10509.9, this article shall be deemed to be part of Article 8 (commencing with Section 10509), and the commissioner may in a single enforcement action seek penalties for a first and a second or subsequent violation.

(b) Nothing in this article shall affect any obligation of an insurer for acts of its agents, or any consumer remedy or cause of action that is otherwise provided for.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 295, Sec. 2.   (AB 689)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.917.

(a) Insurers and insurance producers shall maintain or be able to make available to the commissioner records of the information collected from the consumer and other information used in making the recommendations that were the basis for insurance transactions for five years after the insurance transaction is completed by the insurer. An insurer is permitted, but shall not be required, to maintain documentation on behalf of an insurance producer.

(b) Records required to be maintained by this article may be maintained in paper, photographic, microprocess, magnetic, mechanical, or electronic media, or by any process that accurately reproduces the actual
 document.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 295, Sec. 2.   (AB 689)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.918.

The commissioner shall, from time to time as conditions warrant, after notice and hearing, adopt reasonable rules and regulations, and amendments and additions thereto, as are necessary to administer this article. The commissioner may adopt regulations not inconsistent with this article pursuant to Section 989J of the federal Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act (Public Law 111-203).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 295, Sec. 2.   (AB 689)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.919.

This article shall apply to both of the following:

(a) A recommendation of an annuity made before January 1, 2025, that results in the purchase, exchange, or replacement that was recommended.

(b) A sale of an annuity made before January 1, 2025, that is not based on a recommendation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 2, Sec. 5.   (SB 263)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. Suitability Requirements for Annuity Transactions on or after January 1, 2025 [10509.9200. - 10509.9210.]

10509.9200.

The purpose of this article is to require producers, as defined in Section 10509.9203, to act in the best interest of the consumer when making a recommendation of an annuity and to require insurers to establish, maintain, and utilize a system to supervise recommendations and to set forth standards and procedures for recommendations to consumers that result in transactions involving annuities, so that the insurance needs and financial objectives of consumers at the time of the transaction are effectively addressed. This article does not create or imply a private cause of action for a violation of this article or subject a producer to civil liability under the best interest standard of care outlined in Section 10509.9204 or under standards governing the conduct of a fiduciary relationship.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 2, Sec. 6.   (SB 263)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.9201.

(a) This article shall apply to any sale of, or recommendation made to a consumer to purchase, exchange, or replace, as defined in paragraph (14) of subdivision (a) of Section 10509.9203, an annuity.

(b) This article does not preclude, preempt, or otherwise interfere with the application of any other laws of this state that may apply in any matter involving the sale of an annuity that is subject to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 2, Sec. 6.   (SB 263)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.9202.

Unless otherwise specifically included, this article shall not apply to transactions involving any of the following:

(a) Direct response solicitations where there is no recommendation based on information collected from the consumer pursuant to this article.

(b) Contracts used to fund any of the following:

(1) An employee pension or welfare benefit plan that is covered by the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA) of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq.).

(2) A plan described by Section 401(a), 401(k), 403(b), 408(k), or 408(p) of the Internal Revenue Code (IRC), as
 amended, if established or maintained by an employer.

(3) A government or church plan defined in Section 414 of the IRC, a government or church welfare benefit plan, or a deferred compensation plan of a state or local government or tax-exempt organization under Section 457 of the IRC.

(4) A nonqualified deferred compensation arrangement established or maintained by an employer or plan sponsor.

(5) Settlements of or assumptions of liabilities associated with personal injury litigation or any dispute or claim resolution process.

(6) Formal prepaid funeral contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 2, Sec. 6.   (SB 263)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.9203.

(a) For purposes of this article:

(1) “Annuity” means an annuity that is an insurance product under California law that is individually solicited, whether the product is classified as an individual or group annuity.

(2) “Cash compensation” means any discount, concession, fee, service fee, commission, sales charges, loan, override, or cash benefit received by a producer in connection with the recommendation or sale of an annuity from an insurer, intermediary, or directly from a consumer.

(3) “Consumer profile information” means information that is reasonably appropriate to determine whether a recommendation
 addresses the consumer’s financial situation, insurance needs, and financial objectives, including, at a minimum, the following:

(A) Age.

(B) Annual income.

(C) Financial situation and needs, including debts and other obligations, and the financial resources used for the funding of the annuity.

(D) Financial experience.

(E) Insurance needs.

(F) Financial objectives.

(G) Intended use of the annuity, including any riders attached thereto.

(H) Financial time horizon, including the duration of existing
 liabilities and obligations.

(I) Existing assets or financial products, including investments, annuity, and insurance holdings.

(J) Liquidity needs.

(K) Liquid net worth.

(L) Risk tolerance, including, but not limited to, the willingness to accept nonguaranteed elements in the annuity.

(M) Tax status.

(N) Whether or not the consumer has a reverse mortgage.

(O) Whether or not the consumer intends to apply for means-tested government benefits, including Medi-Cal or the veterans’ aid and attendance benefit.

(P) Any other relevant information that the producer or the insurer knew or reasonably should have known about, as provided by the consumer.

(4) “Continuing education credit” or “CE credit” means one continuing education credit hour as defined in Section 2188.2(i) of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(5) “Continuing education provider” or “CE provider” means an individual or entity that is certified to offer continuing education courses pursuant to Section 2186.1(b) and Section 2188 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(6) “FINRA” means the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority or a successor agency.

(7) “Insurer” means a company required to be licensed or to hold a certificate of authority, or both, under
 California law to provide insurance products, including annuities.

(8) “Intermediary” means an entity contracted directly with an insurer or with another entity contracted with an insurer to facilitate the sale of the insurer’s annuities by producers.

(9) “Material conflict of interest” means a financial interest of the producer in the sale of an annuity that a reasonable person would expect to influence the impartiality of a recommendation. “Material conflict of interest” does not include cash compensation or noncash compensation.

(10) “Noncash compensation” means any form of compensation that is not cash compensation, including, but not limited to, health insurance, office rent, office support, and retirement benefits.

(11) “Nonguaranteed elements”
 means the premiums, benefits, values, credits, charges, and other elements not guaranteed over the life of the annuity, such as credited interest rates, including any temporary bonus interest rate, dividends, noninterest-based credits, index parameters, periodic expense charges, or elements of formulas used to determine any of these nonguaranteed elements, that are subject to insurer discretion and are not guaranteed at issue. An element is considered nonguaranteed if any of the underlying nonguaranteed elements are used in its calculation.

(12) “Producer” means a person required to be licensed under California law to sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance, including annuities. “Producer” includes an insurer when no producer is involved.

(13) (A) “Recommendation” means advice or guidance provided or made by a producer or an insurer to an individual consumer
 that was intended to result or does result in a purchase, exchange, or replacement of an annuity in accordance with that advice or guidance.

(B) “Recommendation” does not include general communication to the public, generalized customer services assistance or administrative support, general educational information and tools, prospectuses, or other product and sales material.

(14) “Replacement” means a transaction in which a new annuity policy or contract is to be purchased, and it is known or should be known to the proposing producer, or to the proposing insurer, whether or not a producer is involved, that by reason of the transaction, an existing annuity or insurance policy has been or is to be any of the following:

(A) Lapsed, forfeited, surrendered or partially surrendered, assigned to the replacing insurer, or
 otherwise terminated.

(B) Converted to reduced paid-up insurance, continued as extended term insurance, or otherwise reduced in value by the use of nonforfeiture benefits or other policy values.

(C) Amended so as to effect either a reduction in benefits or a reduction in the term for which coverage would otherwise remain in force or for which benefits would be paid.

(D) Reissued with any reduction in cash value.

(E) Used in a financed purchase.

(15) “SEC” means the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 2, Sec. 6.   (SB 263)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.9204.

Insurers and producers have the following duties to ensure that annuities that are recommended are in the consumer’s best interest:
